Massachusetts, session 194th, S1615.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 2. In the case of a patient with a home care agency, a hospital shall notify a
patient's home care agency and primary care doctor on discharge steps and medication
instructions in a clear format. A hospital shall ensure notification on treatment steps and any
updated medication to the patient's primary care doctor and home health care agency.
SECTION 3. Section 236 of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding after the words “the urgency of the need for caregiver services”, in
subsection (c), the following words:- A hospital shall ensure clear discharge plan to a family
caregiver including clear instructions to caregivers with limited language proficiency.
SECTION 4. Section 51D of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding after the words “provided separately” the following words:- provided further
that medication instructions are clear.
of 1